North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-12 State University of Agriculture and Applied Science

15-12-01.
Location and name.

The North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science must be located in the city of Fargo in the county of Cass. Wherever the term agricultural college appears in this code, it means the North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science.

Source:

N.D. Const., § 215; S.L. 1890, ch. 160, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 934; R.C. 1899, § 934; R.C. 1905, § 1100; C.L. 1913, § 1604; R.C. 1943, § 15-1201; S.L. 1961, ch. 152, § 1.

Cross-References.

Control and administration by state board of higher education, see N.D.C.C. § 15-10-01.

Control of state, see N.D. Const., art. VIII, § 5.

Establishment and location of university, see N.D. Const., art. IX, § 12.

Patenting inventions by faculty, officials and employees, see N.D.C.C. ch. 47-28.

15-12-02.
Objects and courses of instruction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 162, § 1.

15-12-03.
President — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-12-04.
Faculty — Rules and regulations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-12-05.
Faculty — Annual report to board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-12-06.
Treasurer — Bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 113, § 24.

15-12-06.1.
Treasurer to receive funds appropriated by Congress.

Pursuant to section 2 of an Act of Congress of the United States signed August 30, 1890, providing for the further endowment and support of colleges of agriculture and the mechanic arts, the treasurer of the North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science, Fargo, North Dakota, is hereby designated as the officer to receive from the secretary of the treasury all funds appropriated for North Dakota by the Congress under authority of the said Act and of any amendments to said Act, and of any enactments supplementary to said Act. The treasurer shall make quarterly reports of all funds so received to the director of the budget.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 126, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 15-12061; S.L. 1965, ch. 358, § 16.

15-12-07.
Land grants — Acceptance.

The grants of land accruing to this state by virtue of an Act of Congress donating public lands for the use and support of agricultural colleges, approved February 22, 1889, are accepted with all the conditions and provisions in said Act contained.

Source:

N.D. Const., § 205; S.L. 1890, ch. 160, § 18; R.C. 1895, § 949; R.C. 1899, § 949; R.C. 1905, § 1113; C.L. 1913, § 1617; R.C. 1943, § 15-1207.

15-12-08.
Legislative assent to grant by Congress.

The assent of the legislative assembly is hereby given in pursuance of the requirements of section 9 of said Act of Congress, approved March 2, 1887, to the grant of money therein made and to the establishing of an agricultural experiment station in accordance with section 1 of said Act, and assent is hereby given to carrying out the provisions of such Act.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 160, § 17; R.C. 1895, § 948; R.C. 1899, § 948; R.C. 1905, § 1116; C.L. 1913, § 1620; R.C. 1943, § 15-1208; S.L. 1989, ch. 34, § 17.

15-12-09.
Legislative assent to certain Acts of Congress and acceptance of grants thereunder.

The legislative assent of the state of North Dakota is hereby given to:

The provisions of the Act of Congress entitled, “An Act to authorize the more complete endowment of agricultural experiment stations, and for other purposes” approved February 24, 1925.

The provisions of the Act of Congress entitled, “To provide for the further development of agricultural extension work between the agricultural colleges in the several states receiving the benefits of the act entitled ‘An Act donating public lands to the several states and territories which may provide colleges for the benefit of agriculture and mechanic arts’, approved July 2, 1862, and all acts supplemental thereto, and the United States department of agriculture” approved May 26, 1928.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 1, § 1; 1929, ch. 2, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 15-1209.

15-12-10.
Experiment station — Administered by board — Purpose.

The agricultural experiment station established in connection with the North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science must be operated under the direction of the state board of higher education for the purpose of conducting experiments in agriculture according to the provisions of section 1 of the Act of Congress approved March 2, 1887, entitled “An act to establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with the colleges established in the several states under the provisions of an act approved July 2, 1862, and of the acts supplementary thereto”.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 160, § 16; R.C. 1895, § 947; R.C. 1899, § 947; R.C. 1905, § 1115; C.L. 1913, § 1619; R.C. 1943, § 15-1210.

Cross-References.

Dickinson research center, see N.D.C.C. § 4-05.1-06.

North central research center, see N.D.C.C. § 4-05.1-12.

Williston research center, see N.D.C.C. § 4-05.1-07.

15-12-11.
List of North Dakota state university publications furnished to county auditor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 121, § 1.

15-12-12.
North Dakota state university services and publications — Publication of information. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 3, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 1618a7; R.C. 1943, § 15-1212; S.L. 1987, ch. 206, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 128, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

15-12-13.
Economic survey to be made on completion of topographic maps. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-12-14.
Who shall be state director of economic survey. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-12-15.
State director to collect samples. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-12-16.
Economic maps to be published. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-12-17.
Publish reports of North Dakota agricultural experiment station. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-12-18.
Construction of chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 646, § 12.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-17.4.

15-12-19.
Name of survey. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-12-20.
Veterinary diagnostic laboratory.

The veterinary diagnostic laboratory is located at and is under the supervision and direction of the North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science. The laboratory shall conduct diagnosis of farm and domestic animals and poultry suspected of having diseases and report the findings as directed. The laboratory also shall perform rabies tests as required by section 23-36-03.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 130, §§ 1 to 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 15-1220; 2009, ch. 160, § 1.

Cross-References.

Professor of veterinary science to act as bacteriologist and consulting veterinarian to livestock sanitary board, see N.D.C.C. § 36-01-07.

15-12-21.
State toxicologist — Duties — Fees — Confidentiality. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 236, § 9.

15-12-22.
Economic feasibility institute — Establishment — Director.

There is established an economic feasibility institute to be administered in conjunction with North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science. The university shall appoint a director of the economic feasibility institute.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 197, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, § 6.

15-12-23.
Purpose of the institute.

The purpose of the economic feasibility institute is to initiate, encourage, and enhance the commercial development of both agricultural and nonagricultural products, processes, commodities, and services in North Dakota through the supervision and performance of economic feasibility research.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 197, § 2.

15-12-24.
Powers and duties of the institute.

The institute shall render services and exercise powers consistent with its purpose which include, but are not limited to:

Providing prefeasibility analyses and reports, including:

Initial consultations;

The establishment of levels of funding participation, the level of analysis, and the duration of services to be provided under sections 15-12-22 through 15-12-26; and

Information dissemination activities.

Conducting short-turnaround economic feasibility studies and business and market plan analyses.

Conducting complete feasibility studies directed at analyzing the technical and economic feasibility of approved projects.

Developing and maintaining data bases and making projections to aid state and local planning and policy development.

Evaluating alternatives for providing and financing public services, including community leadership training.

Collaborating for expertise and analysis with other components of North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science, other universities and colleges, and other public entities and the private sector. The institute may not duplicate services or capabilities available through or provided by other public entities.

Contracting for professional and other services necessary to carry out the purpose of sections 15-12-22 through 15-12-26.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 197, § 3.

15-12-25.
Grants and contributions — Continuing appropriation.

The economic feasibility institute may contract for, accept, and receive grants, gifts, and contributions of money, property, services, or other things of value from individuals, the federal government, limited liability companies, private and public corporations, political subdivisions of the state, and other sources. All revenue received from gifts, grants, and contributions is hereby appropriated for use by the economic feasibility institute in carrying out the provisions of sections 15-12-22 through 15-12-26.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 197, § 4; 1991, ch. 95, § 24; 1993, ch. 42, § 14; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2011, ch. 54, § 2.

15-12-26.
Access to institute records.

Materials and data submitted to, or made or received by, the economic feasibility institute, to the extent that the materials or data consist of trade secrets, or commercial, financial, or proprietary information of individuals and entities contracting with the institute or receiving institute services under this chapter, are not public records subject to section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 197, § 5.

15-12-27.
Eighteenth street development fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 3, § 28.

15-12-28.
Dairy diagnostic teams.

The North Dakota state university extension service shall appoint regional dairy diagnostic teams consisting of agricultural business management professionals, dairy extension specialists, and dairy industry partners such as nutrition specialists, reproductive specialists, and animal health specialists. At the request of a dairy producer, a dairy diagnostic team shall conduct a site visit, offer the dairy producer educational and technological assistance, and develop a strategic plan to enhance the producer’s productivity and profitability.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 21, § 9.

15-12-29.
Beef systems center of excellence.

North Dakota state university may establish a beef systems center of excellence in the department of animal and range science. The beef systems center of excellence may:

Create a model for the development of an integrated meat processing industry;

Enhance North Dakota state university’s ability to provide research related to:

The effects of genetics, management, and nutrition regimens on carcass yield, quality, and sensory characteristics;

Food safety and nutrition of the resulting meat products;

New and emerging technologies in slaughter, fabrication, processing, and value-added products; and

Meat and meat product marketing; and

Provide training, education, and outreach opportunities to students, businesses, and beef cattle producers.

North Dakota state university may accept gifts, grants, and donations from public and nonpublic sources to support and benefit the creation and efforts of the beef systems center of excellence, and any gifts, grants, and donations so received are appropriated to North Dakota state university for purposes of the beef systems center of excellence.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 136, § 1.